Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Chapter 6 Wills

Cross references. —

As to privileged communication by a licensed or certified mental health professional, see §

33-38-113

.

As to the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, see chapter 21 of title 40.

Mere assertion that sole beneficiary was domineering personinsufficient to present triable dispute. —

The mere assertion by one contesting a will that the sole beneficiary under the will was a domineering person who “ran the show” was insufficient to present a triable dispute as to whether she improperly controlled the disposition of the testator's property, as a contestant must present some specific facts which give rise to a reasonable inference of undue influence to present a genuine issue for trial. In re Estate of Brosius, 683 P.2d 663,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 303

(Wyo. 1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d Wills § 1 et seq.

Creditor's right to prevent debtor's renunciation of benefit under will or debtor's election to take under will, 39 ALR4th 633.

Alzheimer's disease as affecting testamentary capacity, 47 ALR5th 523.

95 C.J.S. Wills § 1 et seq.